test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-2-athapiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - athapiy :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      athapiy+N+A+Sg: athapiy   #  a net, a fishing-net, a gill net
      athapiy+N+A+Pl: athapiyak   #  nets, fishing-nets, gill nets
      athapiy+N+A+Obv: athapiya   #  an/other net(s), an/other fishing-net(s), an/other gill net(s)

      # Poss
      athapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitathapiy   #  my net, my fishing-net, my gill net
      athapiy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otathapiya   #  his/her other net(s), his/her other fishing-net(s), his/her other gill net(s)
      

      # Nonposs
      athapiy+N+A+Sg: athapiy   #  a net, a fishing-net, a gill net
      athapiy+N+A+Pl: athapiyak   #  nets, fishing-nets, gill nets
      athapiy+N+A+Obv: athapiya   #  an/other net(s), an/other fishing-net(s), an/other gill net(s)
      athapiy+N+A+Distr: athapînâhk   #  among nets, among fishing-nets, among gill nets
      

      # Der/Dim
      athapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [athapîs, athapîsîs]  #  a little net, a little fishing-net, a little gill net
      

      # Poss # Sg
      athapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitathapiy   #  my net, my fishing-net, my gill net
      athapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitathapiy   #  your net, your fishing-net, your gill net
      
      athapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitathapînân   #  our net, our fishing-net, our gill net
      athapiy+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kitathapînaw   #  your and our net, your and our fishing-net, your and our gill net
      athapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitathapîwâw   #  your net, your fishing-net, your gill net
      
      
      

      # Poss # Pl
      athapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitathapiyak   #  my nets, my fishing-nets, my gill nets
      athapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitathapiyak   #  your nets, your fishing-nets, your gill nets
      
      athapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitathapînânak   #  our nets, our fishing-nets, our gill nets
      athapiy+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kitathapînawak   #  your and our nets, your and our fishing-nets, your and our gill nets
      athapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitathapîwâwak   #  your nets, your fishing-nets, your gill nets
      
      
      

      # Poss # Obv
      athapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitathapiya   #  my other net(s), my other fishing-net(s), my other gill net(s)
      athapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kitathapiya   #  your other net(s), your other fishing-net(s), your other gill net(s)
      athapiy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otathapiya   #  his/her other net(s), his/her other fishing-net(s), his/her other gill net(s)
      athapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nitathapînâna   #  our other net(s), our other fishing-net(s), our other gill net(s)
      athapiy+N+A+Px12Pl+Obv: kitathapînawa   #  your and our other net(s), your and our other fishing-net(s), your and our other gill net(s)
      athapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kitathapîwâwa   #  your other net(s), your other fishing-net(s), your other gill net(s)
      athapiy+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otathapîwâwa   #  their other net(s), their other fishing-net(s), their other gill net(s)
      athapiy+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otathapîthiwa   #  another's/others' other net(s), another's/others' other fishing-net(s), another's/others' other gill net(s)
      
